Massachusetts, session 194th, H743.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 100. (a) There is hereby established a school mental health professional grant
program for the purpose of increasing the number of mental health professionals employed by
school districts in the commonwealth to provide mental health support to students.
(b) The department shall award school mental health professional grants to school
districts that apply for grant funds in the form and manner set forth by the commissioner.
(c) Grant funds awarded pursuant to this section shall be used (i) to fund in part or in
whole the salary of any mental health professional employed by the school district or (ii) to fund
of 2

the cost of contracting with a third-party mental health service provider to provide mental health
support to the students of the school district.
(d) The commissioner shall adopt regulations to implement this section, including, but
not limited to, regulations related to any qualifications or certifications required of a mental
health professional whose salary will be funded in part or in whole with grant funds awarded
pursuant to this section.
of 2